Nevada, session 83, SB259.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 377D.130 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
377D.130 1. The money received from any tax imposed
pursuant to NRS 377D.100 and any applicable penalty or interest
must be retained by the county, or remitted to a city [or school
district] in the county, and must only be used to pay the cost of:
(a) [One or more programs of early childhood education
operated by the county school district or any public school in the
county school district;
(b) One or more programs of adult education operated by the
county school district or any public school in the county school
district;
(c) One or more programs to reduce truancy;
(d)] One or more programs to reduce homelessness; and
(b) Establishing, operating or maintaining a public transit
system.
[(e) The development or redevelopment of affordable housing or
ensuring the availability or affordability of housing, including,
without limitation, any infrastructure or services to support the
development or redevelopment of affordable housing;
(f) Incentives for the recruitment or retention of licensed
teachers for high-vacancy schools in the county school district; and
(g) One or more joint labor-management programs of workforce
training in the hospitality industry.]
2. [If a public school ceases to be a high-vacancy school, the
county school district in which the public school is located:
(a) May continue to use the money received by the county
school district from any tax imposed pursuant to NRS 377D.100 to
pay incentives to licensed teachers at the public school pursuant to
paragraph (f) of subsection 1 for the remainder of the school year in
which the public school ceased to be a high-vacancy school; and
(b) Shall not use the money received by the county school
district from any tax imposed pursuant to NRS 377D.100 to pay
incentives to licensed teachers at the public school pursuant to
paragraph (f) of subsection 1 for any subsequent school year unless
the public school newly qualifies as a high-vacancy school.
3.] A county that receives money from a tax imposed pursuant
to NRS 377D.100, and any city [or school district] to which the
money is remitted, must account separately for all such money. On
-
*SB259*

– 3 –
or before November 1 of each year, each such county [,] or city [or
school district] shall prepare a report detailing how all money
received from a tax imposed pursuant to NRS 377D.100 was spent
during the immediately preceding fiscal year and submit the report
to the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmission to
the next session of the Legislature, if the report is submitted in an
even-numbered year, or to the Legislative Commission, if the report
is submitted in an odd-numbered year.
[4.] 3. As used in this section, [“high-vacancy school”]
“public transit system” means a system employing any method of
conveyance that is operated for public [school, other than a charter
school, in which 10 percent or more of the classroom teacher
positions at the public school are:
(a) Vacant for 20 consecutive days or more; or
(b) Filled by a substitute teacher for 20 consecutive days or
more in the same classroom or assignment.] use and transports
persons within a county.
Sec. 2. No money received from a tax imposed by an
ordinance approved pursuant to NRS 377D.130 before October 1,
2025, may be used on or after October 1, 2025, for:
1. Any program of early childhood education operated by the
county school district or any public school in the county school
district;
2. Any program of adult education operated by the county
school district or any public school in the county school district;
3. Any program to reduce truancy;
4. Any development or redevelopment of affordable housing or
ensuring the availability or affordability of housing, including,
without limitation, any infrastructure or services to support the
development or redevelopment of affordable housing;
5. Any incentive for the recruitment or retention of licensed
teachers for high-vacancy schools in the county school district; or
6. Any joint labor-management program of workforce training
in the hospitality industry.
H
-
*SB259*